Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.7
The Nathan Bruno and Jason Flatt Act

16-21.7-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “The Nathan Bruno and Jason Flatt Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

16-21.7-2.
Training.

The department of education shall adopt rules and regulations supporting suicide awareness and prevention training each year for public school personnel and students.

Training shall be required of all personnel hired or contracted by the school district, including, but not limited to: teachers, administration, custodians, lunch personnel, substitutes, nurses, coaches and coaching staff, even if volunteers. The training shall occur every year.

Training shall be required of all students starting in grade six (6) and through grade twelve (12) each academic year.

Training may be provided within the framework of existing in-service training programs offered by the department of education or as part of professional development activities.

The department of education shall, in consultation with the department of health, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, education and healthcare stakeholders, mental healthcare stakeholders, and suicide prevention experts, develop a list of approved training materials to fulfill the requirements of this chapter.

This list shall be fully evaluated and updated at least every three (3) years.

Approved training materials and instruction shall include training on how to identify appropriate mental health services both within the school and the larger community, and when and how to refer youth and their families to those services. These materials and instruction are to be given by qualified suicide prevention instructors as determined by the entities and groups listed in subsection (d)(1) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

16-21.7-3.
Student suicide prevention policy.

Each public school district shall adopt a policy on student suicide prevention. This policy shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention. For the purposes of this chapter, “postvention” means counseling, or other social care given to students after another student’s suicide or attempted suicide. Postvention also means counseling to students that have made a suicide attempt or have reported ideation; this counseling shall consist of regular check-ins. For the purposes of this chapter, “regular” means a frequency as determined by a licensed mental health professional.

To assist school districts in developing policies for student suicide prevention, the department of education shall develop and maintain a model policy, or adopt an existing policy as a model policy, to serve as a guide for school districts in accordance with this chapter to include, but not limited to: parental notification procedures, clarification of engagement with student support personnel, and language defining an in-school issue compared to an out-of-school issue.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

16-21.7-4.
Protection from litigation.

No person shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission resulting from the implementation of the provisions of this chapter or resulting from any training required by this chapter, or lack thereof, unless caused by willful or wanton misconduct.

The training required by the provisions of this chapter, or lack thereof, shall not be construed to impose any specific duty of care except as expressly provided for herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.